Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3270.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 2 O.S. 2021, Section 6-507, as
amended by Section 1, Chapter 47, O.S.L. 2023 (2 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 6-507), is amended to read as follows:
HB3270 HFLR Page 1
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

Section 6-507. It shall be unlawful and a violation of the
Oklahoma Farmed Cervidae Act for any person:
1. To refuse an inspection authorized by the Oklahoma Farmed
Cervidae Act;
2. To commingle or integrate any native cervidae into a farmed
cervidae herd;
3. To intentionally commingle or integrate any farmed cervidae
with native cervidae, except deer that meet the specifications of
the Chronic Wasting Disease Genetic Improvement Act as provided in
Section 6-520 of this title;
4. To fail to maintain records as required by law;
5. To fail to maintain fencing as required by law;
6. To fail to pay any fee, fine, or penalty as required and
established pursuant to the Oklahoma Farmed Cervidae Act;
7. To fail to comply with any State Board of Agriculture order;
or
8. To violate any provision of the Oklahoma Farmed Cervidae
Act.
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY Section 1, Chapter 271, O.S.L.
2024 (2 O.S. Supp. 2025, Section 6-520), is amended to read as
follows:
Section 6-520. A. This section shall be known and may be cited
as the “Chronic Wasting Disease Genetic Improvement Act”.

HB3270 HFLR Page 2
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

B. No later than November 1, 2024, the Oklahoma Department of
Agriculture, Food, and Forestry shall establish a pilot program to
enhance the genetic durability of Oklahoma deer against chronic
wasting disease. Such pilot program shall include, but not be
limited to, the following program characteristics:
1. The Department of Wildlife Conservation will begin
collecting DNA samples to establish a baseline of average genetic
codon markers and genomic breeding values for native, free-ranging
Oklahoma white-tailed deer. For establishing testing locations in
the state, the Department shall use Interstates 35 and 40 as
dividing lines or established Department deer management zones as
published in the current hunting regulations guide;
2. Limit participation in the program to native white-tailed
deer, born and raised in Oklahoma with genetic resistance breeding,
including the SS allele at codon 96, and that surpass the genomic
estimated breeding value cutoff established for the program by the
Oklahoma Department of Agriculture, Food, and Forestry; and
3. Beginning in 2026, during the months of February and March
and through the fifteenth of April, bred female and male deer that
meet the specification of paragraph 2 of this subsection may be
released into native cervidae populations.
C. The Oklahoma Department of Agriculture, Food, and Forestry
and the Department of Wildlife Conservation may promulgate rules as
needed to implement the provisions of this act.
HB3270 HFLR Page 3
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.

D. The Department of Wildlife Conservation Oklahoma Department
of Agriculture, Food, and Forestry may charge a one-time permit fee,
which shall not exceed Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00), for citizens
purchasing deer as a result of criteria established in the pilot
program.
SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation
of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby
declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and
be in full force from and after its passage and approval.

COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON ENERGY AND NATURAL RESOURCES
OVERSIGHT, dated 02/25/2026 - DO PASS, As Amended and Coauthored.













HB3270 HFLR Page 4
BOLD FACE denotes Committee Amendments.